Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 289A.20, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Sales and use tax. (a) The taxes imposed by chapter 297A are due and payable to the commissioner monthly on or before the 20th day of the month following the month in which the taxable event occurred, or following another reporting period as the commissioner prescribes or as allowed under section 289A.18, subdivision 4, paragraph (f) or (g), except that use taxes due on an annual use tax return as provided under section 289A.11, subdivision 1, are payable by April 15 following the close of the calendar year. (b) A vendor having a liability of $250,000 or more during a fiscal year ending June 30, except a vendor of construction materials as defined in paragraph (e), must remit the June new text begin net new text end liability for the next year in the following manner: (1) deleted text begin Two business days before June 30 of calendar year 2020 and 2021, the vendor must remit 87.5 percent of the estimated June liability to the commissioner.deleted text end Two business days before June 30 deleted text begin of calendar year 2022 and thereafterdeleted text end , the vendor must remit 84.5 percentnew text begin of the estimated June net liabiltynew text end , or a reduced percentage as certified by the commissioner under section 16A.152, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (6), of the estimated June new text begin net new text end liability to the commissioner. (2) On or before August 20 of the year, the vendor must pay any additional amount of tax not remitted in June. (c) A vendor having a liability of: (1) $10,000 or more, but less than $250,000, during a fiscal year must remit by electronic means allnew text begin netnew text end liabilities on returns due for periods beginning in all subsequent calendar years on or before the 20th day of the month following the month in which the taxable event occurred, or on or before the 20th day of the month following the month in which the sale is reported under section 289A.18, subdivision 4; or (2) $250,000 or more during a fiscal year must remit by electronic means all new text begin net new text end liabilities in the manner provided in paragraph (a) on returns due for periods beginning in the subsequent calendar year, except that a vendor subject to the remittance requirements of paragraph (b) must remit the percentage of the estimated June new text begin net new text end liability, as provided in paragraph (b), clause (1), which is due two business days before June 30. The remaining amount of the June liability is due on August 20. (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) or (c), a person prohibited by the person's religious beliefs from paying electronically shall be allowed to remit the payment by mail. The filer must notify the commissioner of revenue of the intent to pay by mail before doing so on a form prescribed by the commissioner. No extra fee may be charged to a person making payment by mail under this paragraph. The payment must be postmarked at least two business days before the due date for making the payment in order to be considered paid on a timely basis. (e) For the purposes of paragraph (b), "vendor of construction materials" means a retailer that sells any of the following construction materials, if 50 percent or more of the retailer's sales revenue for the fiscal year ending June 30 is from the sale of those materials: (1) lumber, veneer, plywood, wood siding, wood roofing; (2) millwork, including wood trim, wood doors, wood windows, wood flooring; or (3) concrete, cement, and masonry. new text begin (f) For purposes of this subdivision, "net liability" means liability minus the amount of vendor allowance authorized under section 297A.816. new text end deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end Paragraph (b) expires after the percentage of estimated payment is reduced to zero in accordance with section 16A.152, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (6). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.77, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Tax must be remitted. The tax collected by a retailer under this sectionnew text begin , except for the amount allowed to be retained by a retailer under section 297A.816,new text end must be remitted to the commissioner as provided in chapter 289A and this chapter. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [297A.816] VENDOR ALLOWANCE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin A retailer may retain a portion of sales tax collected as a vendor allowance in compensation for the costs of collecting and administering the tax under this chapter. This section applies only if the tax minus the vendor allowance is both reported and remitted to the commissioner in a timely manner as required under chapter 289A. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Tax not eligible for allowance. new text end new text begin Use taxes paid by the retailer on the retailer's own purchases are not included in calculating the vendor allowance under this section. All other sales and use taxes collected by a retailer are eligible for the vendor allowance under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Calculation of allowance; minimum amounts. new text end new text begin (a) A retailer's vendor allowance is equal to a percentage of eligible taxes collected by the retailer in the reporting period as determined in paragraph (c). The vendor allowance per reporting period must not be less than the lesser of $10 or the amount of eligible taxes collected during the reporting period. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "reporting period" means the period applicable to the retailer as determined under section 289A.18, subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (2) "eligible taxes" means the total amount of taxes collected by a retailer at all locations in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) The vendor allowance authorized under this section must be calculated using the following thresholds and rates: new text end new text begin (1) for vendors with sales tax liability not more than $60,000 in the fiscal year ending June 30, one and one-half percent; new text end new text begin (2) for vendors with sales tax liability more than $60,000 and not more than $600,000 in the fiscal year ending June 30, $900 plus one percent of the amount over $60,000, but not over $600,000; and new text end new text begin (3) for vendors with sales tax liability more than $600,000 in the fiscal year ending June 30, $6,300 plus one-half of one percent of the amount over $600,000. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end